src/import/nouns.lexc
@P.NomStem.First@kavatiin+N:@P.NomStem.First@k`avat´iin TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kavatsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kavatsus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kavatsuslikkus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k`avatsusl´ikkus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kavern+N:@P.NomStem.First@kav´ern TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kašelott+N:@P.NomStem.First@k`ašel´ot,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kašgaar+N:@P.NomStem.First@kašg´aar TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kašmiir+N:@P.NomStem.First@kašm´iir TAUD ;
kašnee+N:kašn´ee%>%{id%}%{rare%} ARMEE ;
kašpoo+N:kašp´oo ARMEE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kašuub+N:@P.NomStem.First@kaš´uub TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kebab+N:@P.NomStem.First@kebab REDEL ;
kebratšo+N:kebr`atšo PERE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keder+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eT2E2r%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
kederluu+N:keder#l´uu%>%{id%} PUU ;
kedri+N:kedri RUBLA ;
kedrid+N:kedri RUBLA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kedrik+N:@P.NomStem.First@kedrik VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@kedrus+N:@P.NomStem.First@kedrus SOOLANE ;
@D.Case.Nom@kee+N:@D.Case.Nom@k´ee ARMEE ;
keede+N:k´eeT2e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keedis+N:@P.NomStem.First@keedis SOOLANE ;
keeduaparaat+N:keedu#`apar´aat TAUD ;
keedukoda+N:keedu#koJ1D1a%{stemill%} KAVA ;
keedukunst+N:keedu#k´un,st TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@keedus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keedus SOOLANE ;
keedutaigen+N:keedu#t´aigE2n MAGUS ;
keeduvili+N:keedu#v´il,J1%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@keefir+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eefir REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@keegel+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eegE2l REDEL ;
keeglimäng+N:k´eegli#m´äng%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeks+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eeks TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@keel+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eel%{stemill%} KEEL ;
keelaja+N:k´eelaja AASTA ;
keelamine+N:k´eelamine OLULINE ;
keelatu+N:keelatu AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeld+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eelD1%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
keeldumine+N:k´eeldumine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeldumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eeldumus OLULINE ;
keelebarjäär+N:keele#barj´äär TAUD ;
keeleinspektsioon+N:keele#inspektsi´oon TAUD ;
keelekandja+N:keele#k´an,dja AASTA ;
keelekandmine+N:keele#k´andmine SUULINE ;
keelekanne+N:keele#k´annD1e PINGE ;
keelekaste+N:keele#k´aste PINGE ;
keelekastmine+N:keele#k´astmine SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelekasutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#kasutus OLULINE ;
keelekeskkond+N:keele#k´eskk´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelekursus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#k´ursus SUULINE ;
keeleköidik+N:keele#köidik VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelekümblus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#k´ümblus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeleküsimus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#küsimus OLULINE ;
keelelõksutamine+N:keele#lõksutamine OLULINE ;
keelemees+N:keele#me MEES ;
keelemurre+N:keele#m´urrD1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelend+N:@P.NomStem.First@keelend REDEL ;
keelenõue+N:keele#n´õuD1e PINGE ;
keeleoskaja+N:keele#´oskaja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeleoskus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#´oskus SUULINE ;
keeleots+N:keele#´ots%>%{pl.i%} KAEL ;
keelepael+N:keele#p´ael%>%{pl.u%} KAEL ;
keelepeks+N:keele#p´eks%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
keelepeksja+N:keele#p´eksja AASTA ;
keelepeksmine+N:keele#p´eksmine SUULINE ;
keeleprobleem+N:keele#probl´eem TAUD ;
keelepruuk+N:keele#pr´uuk TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeleseadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#s´eadus SUULINE ;
keelesepp+N:keele#s´epp%>%{pl.i%} PIIM ;
keelestu+N:keelestu AASTA ;
keeletark+N:keele#t´ark%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
keeleteadlane+N:keele#t´eadlane SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeleteadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#t´eadus SUULINE ;
keeletemp+N:keele#t´emp%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
keeletoimetaja+N:keele#toimetaja AASTA ;
keeletundja+N:keele#t´un,dja AASTA ;
keeletunne+N:keele#t´unnD1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeletus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keeletus OLULINE ;
keeleuurija+N:keele#´uurija AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelevahetus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keele#vahetus OLULINE ;
keelevaist+N:keele#v´aist%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
keelevigur+N:keele#vigur REDEL ;
keeleõpe+N:keele#´õpP1e PINGE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelik+N:@P.NomStem.First@keelik VIRSIK ;
keelikas+N:keelika LOHAKAS ;
keelitamine+N:keelitamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keelitus OLULINE ;
keelkond+N:k´eelk´onnD1%>%{pl.i%} PÄEV ;
keelpill+N:k´eel#p´il,l TAUD ;
keelpillikvartett+N:k´eel#pil,li#kvart´et,t TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelsus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eelsus SUULINE ;
keelsuslane+N:k´eelsuslane OLULINE ;
keelteoskaja+N:keelte#´oskaja AASTA ;
keeluala+N:keelu#ala%>%{pl.u%}%{rare%} KAVA ;
keelualune+N:keelu#alune SOOLANE ;
keelumärk+N:keelu#m´ärk TAUD ;
keelustaja+N:keelustaja AASTA ;
keelustamine+N:keelustamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keelustus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keelustus OLULINE ;
keem+N:k´eem%>%{pl.i%}%{rare%} PIIM ;
keemia+N:k´eemia AASTA ;
keemiakombinaat+N:k´eemia#k`ombin´aat TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@keemiasaadus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eemia#s´aadus SUULINE ;
keemiatehas+N:k´eemia#tehas SOOLANE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keemiatööstus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eemia#t´ööstus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keemik+N:@P.NomStem.First@keemik VIRSIK ;
keenialane+N:k´eenialane OLULINE ;
keenialanna+N:k´eenialanna PERE ;
keenlane+N:k´eenlane OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keep+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eep TAUD ;
keeramine+N:k´eeramine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerang+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerang VIRSIK ;
keerasmik+N:k`eerasm´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerd+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eerD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
keerdkäigustik+N:k´eerd#käigust´ik ELANIK ;
keerdkäik+N:k´eerd#k´äik%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerdküsimus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eerd#küsimus OLULINE ;
keerdsõlm+N:k´eerd#s´õl,m%>%{pl.i%} EIT ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerdumus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eerdumus OLULINE ;
keere+N:k´eerD1e PINGE ;
keere+N:k´eerE2 HAARE ;
keerenski+N:keerenski AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerik+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerik VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@keeris+N:@P.NomStem.First@keeris SOOLANE ;
keeristorm+N:keeris#t´orm TAUD ;
keerisviljak+N:keeris#vil,jak VIRSIK ;
keeritis+N:keeritis OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerits+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerits MAGUS ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerlus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eerlus SUULINE ;
keermestik+N:k´eermest´ik ELANIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@keermestus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keermestus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keermik+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eerm´ik ÄMBLIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerub+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerub REDEL ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerukus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerukus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerulisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerulisus OLULINE ;
keerusai+N:keeru#s´ai%>%{pl.u%} PIIM ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerustus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerustus OLULINE ;
keerutamine+N:keerutamine OLULINE ;
keerutis+N:keerutis OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keerutus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keerutus OLULINE ;
keet+N:k´eet%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@keetel+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eetE2l REDEL ;
keetmine+N:k´eetmine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keevalisus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keevalisus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keevis+N:@P.NomStem.First@keevis SOOLANE ;
keevitaja+N:keevitaja AASTA ;
@P.NomStem.First@keevitatavus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keevitatavus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keevitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keevitus OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@keevus+N:@P.NomStem.First@k´eevus SUULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kefaal+N:@P.NomStem.First@kef´aal TAUD ;
@P.NomStem.First@kefiir+N:@P.NomStem.First@kef´iir TAUD ;
keha+N:keha%>%{pl.i%} KAVA ;
@P.NomStem.First@kehaehitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keha#ehitus OLULINE ;
kehahoid+N:keha#h´oiD1%>%{pl.e%}%{rare%} KOON ;
kehakaal+N:keha#k´aal%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
kehakate+N:keha#k´atT1e PINGE ;
kehake+N:kehake PEENIKE ;
kehakeel+N:keha#k´eel%{stemill%} KEEL ;
kehakinnitamine+N:keha#kinnitamine OLULINE ;
@P.NomStem.First@kehakinnitus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keha#kin,nitus OLULINE ;
kehakuju+N:keha#kuju KAVA ;
kehakultuur+N:keha#kult´uur TAUD ;
kehakultuurlane+N:keha#kult´uurlane SUULINE ;
kehalaad+N:keha#l´aad, TAUD ;
kehaliige+N:keha#l´iiK2E2 HAARE ;
kehamaaling+N:keha#maal,ing VIRSIK ;
@P.NomStem.First@kehand+N:@P.NomStem.First@kehand REDEL ;
kehaosa+N:keha#osa%>%{pl.i%}%{stemill%} OSA ;
kehaseis+N:keha#s´eis%>%{pl.e%} KOON ;
@P.NomStem.First@kehasoojus+N:@P.NomStem.First@keha#s´oojus SUULINE ;
